Mississippi, session 2026, HB840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this subsection: (a)  "Artificial intelligence system" means an engineered or machine based system that emulates the capability of a person to receive audio, visual, text or any other form of information and use such information to emulate a human cognitive process, including, but not limited to, learning, generalizing, reasoning, planning, predicting, acting or communicating, provided that the artificial intelligence systems may vary in the forms of information they can receive and in the human cognitive processes they can emulate. (b)  "Designated offense" means: (i)  Abuse, neglect or exploitation of any vulnerable person in violation of Section 43-47-19; (ii)  Stalking or aggravated stalking in violation of Section 97-3-107; (iii)  Sexual extortion in violation of Section 97-3-119.2 or aggravated sexual extortion in violation of Section 97-3-119.3; (iv)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 5, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to offenses affecting children; (v)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 7, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to crimes against sovereignty or administration of government; (vi)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 9, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to offenses affecting administration of justice; (vii)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 19, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to false pretenses and cheats; (viii)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 21, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to forgery and counterfeiting; (ix)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 29, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to crimes against public morals and decency; or (x)  Any offense provided for in Chapter 45, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, that relates to computer crimes and identity theft. (c)  "Used an artificial intelligence system" means to be the proximate cause of an artificial intelligence system receiving an input or providing an output. (2)  If a trier of fact determines beyond a reasonable doubt that a defendant knowingly and intentionally used an artificial intelligence system in the commission of a designated offense, the penalty for the designated offense may be enhanced as follows: (a)  If the designated offense for which the defendant was convicted is a misdemeanor, by a term of imprisonment for a period of not less than six (6) nor more than twelve (12) months and a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); (b)  If the designated offense for which the defendant was convicted is a felony, by a term of imprisonment for a period of not less than two (2) years and a fine not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); or (c)  If the designated offense is subject to a minimum term of imprisonment for two (2) years or more, by a term of imprisonment for not less than such minimum sentence plus one (1) year and a fine of not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (3)  (a)  For the enhancement of the penalty for a felony offense to apply as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the prosecuting attorney if the defendant is charged by information, or grand jury if an indictment is returned, shall provide notice upon the information or indictment that the prosecutor will seek the enhanced penalty.  The notice shall be in a clause separate from and in addition to the substantive offense charged and shall allege the specific factor or factors authorizing an enhanced penalty in the case pursuant to this section. (b)  For enhancement of the penalty for a misdemeanor to apply as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the affiant, the prosecuting attorney if the defendant is charged by information, or grand jury if an indictment is returned, shall provide written notice that the enhanced penalty will be sought.  The notice shall be in a clause separate from and in addition to the substantive offense charge and shall allege the specific factor or factors authorizing an enhanced penalty in the case pursuant to this section. SECTION 2.  Section 97-5-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-5-33.  (1)  No person shall, by any means, including computer, cause, solicit or knowingly permit any child to engage in sexually explicit conduct or in the simulation of sexually explicit conduct for the purpose of producing any visual depiction of such conduct. (2)  No person shall, by any means, including computer, photograph, film, video tape or otherwise depict or record a child engaging in sexually explicit conduct or in the simulation of sexually explicit conduct. (3)  No person shall, by any means including computer, knowingly send, transport, transmit, ship, mail or receive any photograph, drawing, sketch, film, video tape or other visual depiction of an actual child, or of a child that would appear realistic to a reasonable observer, engaging in sexually explicit conduct. (4)  No person shall, by any means including computer, receive with intent to distribute, distribute for sale, sell or attempt to sell in any manner any photograph, drawing, sketch, film, video tape or other visual depiction of an actual child, or of a child that would appear realistic to a reasonable observer, engaging in sexually explicit conduct. (5)  No person shall, by any means, including computer, knowingly possess or knowingly access with intent to view any photograph, drawing, sketch, film, video tape or other visual depiction of an actual child, or of a child that would appear realistic to a reasonable observer, engaging in sexually explicit conduct. (6)  No person shall, by any means, including computer, knowingly entice, induce, persuade, seduce, solicit, advise, coerce, or order a child to meet with the defendant or any other person for the purpose of engaging in sexually explicit conduct. (7)  No person shall, by any means, including computer, knowingly entice, induce, persuade, seduce, solicit, advise, coerce or order a child to produce any visual depiction of adult sexual conduct or any sexually explicit conduct. (8)  The fact that an undercover operative or law enforcement officer posed as a child or was involved in any other manner in the detection and investigation of an offense under this section shall not constitute a defense to a prosecution under this section. (9)  For purposes of determining jurisdiction, the offense is committed in this state if all or part of the conduct described in this section occurs in the State of Mississippi or if the transmission that constitutes the offense either originates in this state or is received in this state. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.